Illinois, session 104th, SB3866.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 155.50 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/155.50 new)7    Sec. 155.50. Provider search directories.8    (a) The Department of Insurance shall establish and 9maintain a dedicated, publicly accessible webpage on its 10official website that compiles and provides direct hyperlinks 11to the provider search directories or tools maintained by each 12health insurance issuer regulated by the Department.13    (b) The webpage shall include, at a minimum:14        (1) links to search tools for in-network providers;15        (2) clear labeling of each insurer's link, including 16    the insurer's name and any relevant contact information 17    for consumer assistance; and18        (3) instructions for users on how to utilize the 19    linked directories.20    (c) Each regulated health insurance issuer shall submit to 21the Department, upon request and at least annually, the 22current URL for its provider search directory and notify the 23Department of any changes within 30 days. Failure to comply   SB3866- 2 -LRB104 17924 BAB 31361 b1may result in penalties as provided under Section 444 of this 2Code.3    (d) The Department shall update the webpage promptly upon 4receipt of new information and ensure it is user-friendly, 5mobile-responsive, and accessible.6    (e) This Section applies to all health insurance issuers 7offering individual or group health insurance policies in this 8State that are subject to regulation by the Department.